Illinois, session 104th, HB2887.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2 and 3.2 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/2)  (from Ch. 116, par. 202)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    (a) "Public body" means all legislative, executive, 9administrative, or advisory bodies of the State, state 10universities and colleges, counties, townships, cities, 11villages, incorporated towns, school districts and all other 12municipal corporations, boards, bureaus, committees, or 13commissions of this State, any subsidiary bodies of any of the 14foregoing including but not limited to committees and 15subcommittees thereof, and a School Finance Authority created 16under Article 1E of the School Code. "Public body" does not 17include a child death review team or the Illinois Child Death 18Review Teams Executive Council established under the Child 19Death Review Team Act, or a regional youth advisory board or 20the Statewide Youth Advisory Board established under the 21Department of Children and Family Services Statewide Youth 22Advisory Board Act.23    (b) "Person" means any individual, corporation,   HB2887- 2 -LRB104 08862 BDA 18917 b1partnership, firm, organization or association, acting 2individually or as a group.3    (c) "Public records" means all records, reports, forms, 4writings, letters, memoranda, books, papers, maps, 5photographs, microfilms, cards, tapes, recordings, electronic 6data processing records, electronic communications, recorded 7information and all other documentary materials pertaining to 8the transaction of public business, regardless of physical 9form or characteristics, having been prepared by or for, or 10having been or being used by, received by, in the possession 11of, or under the control of any public body.12    (c-5) "Private information" means unique identifiers, 13including a person's social security number, driver's license 14number, employee identification number, biometric identifiers, 15personal financial information, passwords or other access 16codes, medical records, home or personal telephone numbers, 17and personal email addresses. Private information also 18includes home address and personal license plates, except as 19otherwise provided by law or when compiled without possibility 20of attribution to any person. For a public body that is a 21HIPAA-covered entity, "private information" includes 22electronic medical records and all information, including 23demographic information, contained within or extracted from an 24electronic medical records system operated or maintained by 25the public body in compliance with State and federal medical 26privacy laws and regulations, including, but not limited to,   HB2887- 3 -LRB104 08862 BDA 18917 b1the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and 2its regulations, 45 CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this 3subsection, "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to 4the term "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103.5    (c-10) "Commercial purpose" means the use of any part of a 6public record or records, or information derived from public 7records, in any form for sale, resale, or solicitation or 8advertisement for sales or services. For purposes of this 9definition, requests made by news media and non-profit, 10scientific, or academic organizations shall not be considered 11to be made for a "commercial purpose" when the principal 12purpose of the request is (i) to access and disseminate 13information concerning news and current or passing events, 14(ii) for articles of opinion or features of interest to the 15public, or (iii) for the purpose of academic, scientific, or 16public research or education.17    (d) "Copying" means the reproduction of any public record 18by means of any photographic, electronic, mechanical or other 19process, device or means now known or hereafter developed and 20available to the public body.21    (e) "Head of the public body" means the president, mayor, 22chairman, presiding officer, director, superintendent, 23manager, supervisor or individual otherwise holding primary 24executive and administrative authority for the public body, or 25such person's duly authorized designee.26    (f) "News media" means a newspaper or other periodical   HB2887- 4 -LRB104 08862 BDA 18917 b1issued at regular intervals whether in print or electronic 2format, a news service whether in print or electronic format, 3a radio station, a television station, a television network, a 4community antenna television service, or a person or 5corporation engaged in making news reels or other motion 6picture news for public showing.7    (g) "Recurrent requester", as used in Section 3.2 of this 8Act, means a person that, in the 12 months immediately 9preceding the request, has submitted to the same public body 10(i) a minimum of 40 50 requests for records, (ii) a minimum of 1110 15 requests for records within a 30-day period, or (iii) a 12minimum of 5 7 requests for records within a 7-day period. For 13purposes of this definition, requests made by news media and 14non-profit, scientific, or academic organizations shall not be 15considered in calculating the number of requests made in the 16time periods in this definition when the principal purpose of 17the requests is (i) to access and disseminate information 18concerning news and current or passing events, (ii) for 19articles of opinion or features of interest to the public, or 20(iii) for the purpose of academic, scientific, or public 21research or education.22    For the purposes of this subsection (g), "request" means a 23written document (or oral request, if the public body chooses 24to honor oral requests) that is submitted to a public body via 25personal delivery, mail, telefax, electronic mail, or other 26means available to the public body and that identifies the   HB2887- 5 -LRB104 08862 BDA 18917 b1particular public record the requester seeks. One request may 2identify multiple records to be inspected or copied. 3    (h) "Voluminous request" means a request that: (i) 4includes more than 5 individual requests for more than 5 5different categories of records or a combination of individual 6requests that total requests for more than 5 different 7categories of records in a period of 20 business days; or (ii) 8requires the compilation of more than 500 letter or 9legal-sized pages of public records unless a single requested 10record exceeds 500 pages. "Single requested record" may 11include, but is not limited to, one report, form, e-mail, 12letter, memorandum, book, map, microfilm, tape, or recording.13    "Voluminous request" does not include a request made by 14news media and non-profit, scientific, or academic 15organizations if the principal purpose of the request is: (1) 16to access and disseminate information concerning news and 17current or passing events; (2) for articles of opinion or 18features of interest to the public; or (3) for the purpose of 19academic, scientific, or public research or education.20    For the purposes of this subsection (h), "request" means a 21written document, or oral request, if the public body chooses 22to honor oral requests, that is submitted to a public body via 23personal delivery, mail, telefax, electronic mail, or other 24means available to the public body and that identifies the 25particular public record or records the requester seeks. One 26request may identify multiple individual records to be   HB2887- 6 -LRB104 08862 BDA 18917 b1inspected or copied. 2    (i) "Severance agreement" means a mutual agreement between 3any public body and its employee for the employee's 4resignation in exchange for payment by the public body. 5(Source: P.A. 103-554, eff. 1-1-24.) 6    (5 ILCS 140/3.2)7    Sec. 3.2. Recurrent requesters.8    (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this Act to the 9contrary, a public body shall respond to a request from a 10recurrent requester, as defined in subsection (g) of Section 112, within 21 business days after receipt. The response shall 12(i) provide to the requester an estimate of the time required 13by the public body to provide the records requested and an 14estimate of the fees to be charged, which the public body may 15require the person to pay in full before copying the requested 16documents, (ii) deny the request pursuant to one or more of the 17exemptions set out in this Act, (iii) notify the requester 18that the request is unduly burdensome and extend an 19opportunity to the requester to attempt to reduce the request 20to manageable proportions, or (iv) provide the records 21requested.22    (b) Within 5 business days after receiving a request from 23a recurrent requester, as defined in subsection (g) of Section 242, the public body shall notify the requester (i) that the 25public body is treating the request as a request under   HB2887- 7 -LRB104 08862 BDA 18917 b1subsection (g) of Section 2, (ii) of the reasons why the public 2body is treating the request as a request under subsection (g) 3of Section 2, and (iii) that the public body will send an 4initial response within 30 21 business days after receipt in 5accordance with subsection (a) of this Section, and (iv) that 6any additional requests received from the requester within the 730-day response period shall also be treated as a request 8under subsection (g) of Section 2. The public body shall also 9notify the requester of the proposed responses that can be 10asserted pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section. The 11notification is required to be sent only once during the 1230-day response period. 13    (c) Unless the records are exempt from disclosure, a 14public body shall comply with a request within a reasonable 15period considering the size and complexity of the request and 16may reasonably determine the format of the records produced.17    (d) It is a violation of this Act for a person designated 18as a recurrent requester under subsection (g) of Section 2 to 19knowingly obtain a public record without disclosing the 20person's status as a recurrent requester. 21(Source: P.A. 97-579, eff. 8-26-11; 98-756, eff. 7-16-14.)